Maryland, session 2025, SB0833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–525.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Treatment foster care home” means an out–of–home placement facility
that is part of a program designed and implemented by a child placement agency to provide
intensive casework and treatment in a family setting to children with special physical,
emotional, or behavioral needs.
– 1 –

Ch. 528 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5–525.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “SECRETARY” MEANS THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES.
(3) “TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 5–525.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY
SHALL, BEFORE SUBMITTING A BUDGET PROPOSAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, REVIEW AND REALLOCATE A PORTION OF THE DEPARTMENT’S
ANNUAL BUDGET TO BE USED FOR PROVIDING CHILD CARE STIPENDS TO PRIVATE
TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOMES TO COVER CHILD CARE EXPENSES IN A SIMILAR
MANNER AS PUBLIC TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOMES.
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE SECRETARY SHALL INCLUDE IN THE DEPARTMENT’S ANNUAL BUDGET
PROPOSAL TO THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT A REQUEST FOR
AN AMOUNT OF FUNDING THAT IS AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING
THE SECRETARY REALLOCATED FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR FOR PRIVATE
TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOMES IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(C) WHEN REVIEWING WHETHER ANY FUNDS SHOULD BE REALLOCATED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL DETERMINE
THE REALLOCATION BASED ON THE FUNDING NEEDS FOR EACH LOCAL
DEPARTMENT THAT WORKS WITH PRIVATE TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOMES AND
THE FAMILIES OF THE CHILDREN BEING PLACED IN A HOME.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING
APPLICATION PROCEDURES AND CRITERIA FOR AWARDING CHILD CARE STIPENDS
TO PRIVATE TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOMES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE APPLICATION PROCEDURES DEVELOPED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL REQUIRE THAT A PRIVATE TREATMENT
FOSTER CARE HOME:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 528
(I) MEET OR EXCEED THE SAME STANDARDS AS A PUBLIC
TREATMENT FOSTER CARE HOME WITH RESPECT TO EQUITY STANDARDS AND
CULTURAL COMPETENCY REQUIREMENTS; AND
(II) DOES NOT DISCRIMINATE BASED ON RACE, COLOR,
RELIGION, SEX, AGE, NATIONAL ORIGIN, MARITAL STATUS, SEXUAL ORIENTATION,
GENDER IDENTITY, OR DISABILITY WHEN PROVIDING SERVICES OR PLACEMENTS.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall conduct a study to determine the
types of State support, in the form of funding or otherwise, that would be appropriate and
beneficial to assist private providers of treatment foster care homes, as defined in § 5–525.2
of the Family Law Article, in the provision of services.
(b) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department of Human Services shall
report its findings and recommendations, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
June 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of May 31, 2026,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –